Washington statutes.
RCW 36.05.070

Copies of decree to be filed and recorded.

The clerk of the court in whose office a decree is entered under the provisions of this chapter, shall forthwith furnish certified copies thereof to the secretary of state, and to the auditors of the counties, which are parties to said suit. The secretary of state, and the county auditors, shall file and record said copies of the decree in their respective offices.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.05.070. Prior: 1897 c 76 s 8; RRS s 3971.]